Arkansas, session 2025, HB1510.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 14-17-208(i), concerning subdivision,
setback, and entry control ordinances for county planning boards, is
repealed.
(i) In unincorporated areas adjoining the corporate limits of a
municipality in which the authority to control the subdivision of land is
vested and is being exercised in accordance with and under the provisions of
§§ 14-56-401 — 14-56-408 and 14-56-410 — 14-56-425, or any amendments thereto
or thereof, or other acts of a similar nature enacted by the General
Assembly, the municipal authority shall have subdivision jurisdiction, but
shall transmit copies of proposed plats for the areas to the county planning
board and the board of directors of each affected school district for review
and comment, which shall be made to the municipal authority within sixty (60)
days from the time it is received by the county planning board and the board
*SSS123*
02/17/2025 3:35:42 PM SSS123

HB1510
of directors of each affected school district unless further time is allowed
by the municipal authority.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 14-17-208(l)(1), concerning subdivision,
setback, and entry control ordinances for county planning boards, is amended
to read as follows:
(l)(1) Following the adoption of any subdivision, setback, or entry
control ordinances by the court, a plat in an unincorporated area of a county
not within the exercised extraterritorial jurisdiction of a municipality
shall not be presented for recording without the approval of the county
planning board.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 14-38-101(b)(1)(B), concerning limitations
on a petition for incorporation, is repealed.
(B) The area in which that existing municipal corporation
is exercising its planning territorial jurisdiction.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 14-40-208 is repealed.
14-40-208. Annexation of territory under municipal territorial
jurisdiction.
(a) If a municipality states its intent by resolution or ordinance to
annex a specifically defined territory or portion of the territory over which
it is exercising territorial jurisdiction under § 14-56-413, the municipality
shall initiate annexation proceedings within five (5) years of the stated
intent.
(b)(1) During the five (5) years under subsection (a) of this section,
the municipality may continue to exercise its territorial jurisdiction under
§ 14-56-413, including the defined territory specified within its intent to
annex.
(2) If the municipality does not initiate annexation proceedings
of the territory specified within its intent to annex within five (5) years
of the effective date of the resolution or ordinance under subsection (a) of
this section, the municipality is prohibited from again exercising
territorial jurisdiction over the territory specified within its intent to
annex for the next five (5) years.

02/17/2025 3:35:42 PM SSS123

HB1510
SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 14-56-413 is repealed.
14-56-413. Territorial jurisdiction.
(a)(1)(A) The territorial jurisdiction of the governing body of a
municipality for the purpose of this subchapter shall not exceed the limits
stated under this subsection.
(B) If the territorial limits of two (2) or more
municipalities conflict, the limits of their respective territorial
jurisdictions shall be a line equidistant between them, or as agreed on by
the respective municipalities.
(2) In addition to the powers under this subchapter, cities now
having eight thousand (8,000) population or more shall have the authority to
administer and enforce planning ordinances outside their corporate limits as
follows:
(A) For cities of eight thousand (8,000) to sixty thousand
(60,000) population, the jurisdictional area will be one (1) mile beyond the
corporate limits;
(B) For cities of sixty thousand (60,000) to one hundred
fifty thousand (150,000) population, the jurisdictional area will be two (2)
miles beyond the corporate limits; and
(C)(i) For cities of one hundred fifty thousand (150,000)
population and greater, the jurisdictional area will be three (3) miles
beyond the corporate limits.
(ii) Upon July 3, 1989, no city with a population in
excess of one hundred fifty thousand (150,000) persons shall exercise any
zoning authority outside the boundaries of the county wherein it is located
without the approval of the quorum court of the county wherein the city is
not located and the approval of the governing bodies of all other cities
having zoning authority over the area.
(3) Cities having a population of eight thousand (8,000) persons
or less:
(A) Shall have a jurisdictional area that does not exceed
one (1) mile beyond the corporate limits; and
(B) Shall not exercise any zoning authority outside the
corporate limits.
(4) Cities now having an eight thousand (8,000) population or
more and situated on a navigable stream may administer and enforce zoning
02/17/2025 3:35:42 PM SSS123

HB1510
ordinances outside their corporate limits but may not exceed the territorial
limits under subdivision (a)(2) of this section.
(5) The city populations will be based on the most recent
federal decennial census.
(b)(1) The planning commission shall designate the area within the
territorial jurisdiction for which it will prepare plans, ordinances, and
regulations.
(2) A description of the boundaries of the area shall be filed
with the city clerk and with the county recorder.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 14-56-417(c), concerning the regulations to
control development of land, is repealed.
(c) A plat within the area within which the municipality intends to
exercise its territorial jurisdiction as indicated on the planning area map
shall not be presented for recording without the approval of the planning
commission, if a planning commission exists.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 14-56-422(5)(B), concerning adoption of
plans, ordinances, and regulations for municipal planning, is repealed.
(B) The city clerk shall file the plans, ordinances, and
regulations as pertain to the territory beyond the corporate limits with the
county recorder of the counties in which territorial jurisdiction is being
exercised.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 14-284-207(a), concerning a quorum court's
establishment of a fire protection district service area, is amended to read
as follows:
(a)(1) The quorum court of each county in which a fire protection
district is located shall establish the service area of the fire protection
district.
(2) The service area of a fire protection district created after
January 1, 2021, shall not include any area within the territorial
jurisdiction of the governing body of a municipality as established in § 14-
56-413 that has adopted an ordinance to provide fire protection services to
the area in accordance with § 14-53-102, unless waived by majority vote of
the governing body of the municipality.
02/17/2025 3:35:42 PM SSS123

HB1510

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 17-28-305(b)(3), concerning the local
regulatory authority of the licensing of electricians, is repealed.
(3) If the city has adopted an ordinance to exercise its
territorial planning jurisdiction, the city may exercise jurisdiction over
the construction, installation, and inspection of electrical work within the
city's territorial planning jurisdiction under § 14-56-413 if the city and
county agree to the exercise of jurisdiction by the city over electrical work
within the city's territorial planning jurisdiction.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 18-15-1702(6), concerning definitions for
the Private Property Protection Act, is repealed.
(6) “Territorial jurisdiction” means the territorial jurisdiction
of a municipality as described in § 14-56-413.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 18-15-1703(e)(15), concerning the
application of takings under the Private Property Protection Act, is
repealed.
(15) An action by a municipality unless the regulatory program
has effect in the territorial jurisdiction of the municipality, excluding
annexation, and that enacts or enforces a regulatory program that does not
impose identical requirements or restrictions in the entire territorial
jurisdiction of the municipality.













02/17/2025 3:35:42 PM SSS123